Utah statutes.
32A-6-502 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Church or religious organization exemption.

(1)  A church or religious organization that provides or allows to be provided any alcoholic product to any person as part of the church's or religious organization's religious services:

(a)  does not violate this title by providing or allowing the provision of an alcoholic product as part of the religious service; and

(b)  is not required to hold a special use permit or license to provide or allow the provision of an alcoholic product for the religious services.

(2)  This exemption does not exempt a church or religious organization from complying with this title with respect to alcoholic beverages purchased by the church or religious organization for purposes other than the purpose stated in Subsection (1).

